North Carolina, session 2025, SB638.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING PROCESS
SECTION 1.(a) Section 3 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 3. Senate districts; apportionment of Senators.
The Senators shall be elected from districts. The General Assembly, at the first regular session
convening after the return of every decennial census of population taken by order of Congress,
shall revise the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators among those districts, subject
to the following requirements:Assembly shall establish an independent process to revise the
senate districts and the apportionment of Senators among those districts pursuant to Section 25
of this Article.
(1) Each Senator shall represent, as nearly as may be, an equal number of inhabitants, the
number of inhabitants that each Senator represents being determined for this purpose by dividing
the population of the district that he represents by the number of Senators apportioned to that
district;
(2) Each senate district shall at all times consist of contiguous territory;
(3) No county shall be divided in the formation of a senate district;
(4) When established, the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators shall remain
unaltered until the return of another decennial census of population taken by order of Congress."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 5 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 5. Representative districts; apportionment of Representatives.
The Representatives shall be elected from districts. The General Assembly, at the first regular
session convening after the return of every decennial census of population taken by order of
Congress, shall revise the representative districts and the apportionment of Representatives
among those districts, subject to the following requirements:Assembly shall establish an
independent process to revise the representative districts and the apportionment of
Representatives among those districts pursuant to Section 25 of this Article.
(1) Each Representative shall represent, as nearly as may be, an equal number of
inhabitants, the number of inhabitants that each Representative represents being determined for
*S638-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
this purpose by dividing the population of the district that he represents by the number of
Representatives apportioned to that district;
(2) Each representative district shall at all times consist of contiguous territory;
(3) No county shall be divided in the formation of a representative district;
(4) When established, the representative districts and the apportionment of
Representatives shall remain unaltered until the return of another decennial census of population
taken by order of Congress."
SECTION 1.(c) Article II of the North Carolina Constitution is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"Sec. 25. Redistricting.
The General Assembly shall establish by law an independent process to revise electoral
districts for Congress and the General Assembly after the return of every decennial census of
population taken by order of Congress. The process shall meet at least all of the following
requirements:
(1) Neither the General Assembly nor the Governor shall have any role in revising
electoral districts for the General Assembly or the House of Representatives of the United States
Congress.
(2) Each member of the Senate and House of Representatives of the General Assembly
and the House of Representatives of the United States Congress shall represent, as nearly as may
be, an equal number of inhabitants.
(3) Each electoral district shall at all times consist of contiguous territory.
(4) When established, the electoral districts for the Senate and House of Representatives
of the General Assembly shall remain unaltered until the return of another decennial census of
population taken by order of Congress.
(5) Electoral districts adopted pursuant to the process shall have the force and effect of
acts of the General Assembly."
SECTION 1.(d) Subsection (5) of Section 22 of Article II of the North Carolina
Constitution reads as rewritten:
"(5) Other exceptions. Appointments to office. Every bill:
(a) In bill in which the General Assembly makes an appointment or appointments
to public office and which contains no other matter;
(b) Revising the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators among those
districts and containing no other matter;
(c) Revising the representative districts and the apportionment of Representatives
among those districts and containing no other matter; or
(d) Revising the districts for the election of members of the House of
Representatives of the Congress of the United States and the apportionment
of Representatives among those districts and containing no other matter,
matter shall be read three times in each house before it becomes law and shall
be signed by the presiding officers of both houses."
SECTION 1.(e) The amendments set out in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this
section shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the general election in November
2026, which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State.
Ballots, voting systems, or both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
A constitutional amendment providing for an independent redistricting process for
electoral districts for Congress and the General Assembly. The General Assembly would
establish the process but have no role in the revising of districts."
SECTION 1.(f) If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the
amendments set out in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section, the State Board of Elections
Page 2 Senate Bill 638-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall certify the amendments to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall enroll the
amendments so certified among the permanent records of that office. The amendments set out in
subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section are effective upon certification.
SECTION 1.(g) Chapter 120 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 1B.
"Redistricting.
"§ 120-4.50. Definitions.
As used in this Article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions shall
apply:
(1) Census Bureau. – The United States Bureau of the Census.
(2) Commission. – The North Carolina Citizens Redistricting Commission
established pursuant to G.S. 120-4.55.
(3) Communities of interest. – Contiguous and cohesive populations of persons
that share common social, economic, or policy interests. Communities of
interest shall not include common relationships with political parties or
political candidates. Communities of interest include, but are not limited to,
populations that share any of the following characteristics:
a. A racial, cultural, geographic, or ethnic identity.
b. A common history of marginalization or discrimination.
c. Natural resources.
d. Excessive damage from past or present natural disasters or pollution.
e. An organized decision-making body.
(4) Congressional districts or plans. – Districts or plans for the House of
Representatives of the United States Congress.
(5) Federal census. – The decennial census required by federal law to be
conducted by the Census Bureau in every year ending in zero.
(6) Final plan. – A plan adopted by the Commission to be used for the purpose of
nominating and electing identified representatives. In accordance with Section
25 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution, final plans shall have the
force and effect of acts of the General Assembly.
(7) Ideal population. – The number determined by dividing the number of
members in a plan into the population of the State as reported in the federal
census.
(8) Identified representative. – A member of the Senate or House of
Representatives of the General Assembly or a member of the House of
Representatives of the United States Congress.
(9) Legislative districts or plans. – Districts or plans for the Senate and House of
Representatives of the General Assembly.
(10) Metropolitan or micropolitan statistical areas. – Areas of the State defined as
metropolitan or micropolitan statistical areas by the Office of Management
and Budget of the United States.
(11) Plan. – A plan for legislative or congressional reapportionment drawn in
accordance with Section 25 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution
and this Article.
(12) Preliminary plan. – An initial plan released by the Commission for public
input at the beginning of the redistricting cycle.
(13) Proposed and alternative plans. – Plans released by the Commission following
public input.
(14) Public office. – Elective State, local, or federal office.
Senate Bill 638-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(15) Relative. – An individual who is related to the person in question as father,
mother, son, daughter, brother, sister, uncle, aunt, first cousin, nephew, niece,
husband, wife, grandfather, grandmother, father-in-law, mother-in-law,
son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, stepfather,
stepmother, stepson, stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, or
half-sister.
"§ 120-4.55. North Carolina Citizens Redistricting Commission.
(a) Establishment. – There is established the North Carolina Citizens Redistricting
Commission in accordance with Section 25 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution to
prepare preliminary, proposed, and alternative plans and to adopt final plans for the purpose of
nominating and electing members of the Senate and House of Representatives of the General
Assembly and the House of Representatives of the United States Congress.
(b) Eligibility. – A resident of North Carolina is eligible to apply for membership on the
Commission if that person meets all of the following requirements:
(1) Has been a registered voter in North Carolina with the same party affiliation,
or lack thereof, for at least four years prior to commencement of service on
the Commission. This requirement does not apply to persons under the age of
25.
(2) Has not contributed during one election cycle cumulatively more than two
thousand dollars ($2,000) to any candidate for public office.
(3) Does not hold public office.
(4) Is not any of the following:
a. A relative of (i) a current member of the General Assembly, (ii) a
current member of the North Carolina Council of State, or (iii) a
covered person, as defined in G.S. 138A-3(21).
b. A political appointee of the General Assembly.
c. A staff member or legal counsel to the General Assembly.
d. An official of a political party or a consultant or legal counsel to a
political party in the United States.
e. A candidate for public office.
(5) Has never done any of the following:
a. Been elected to serve in any of the following:
1. The General Assembly or Congress at the time of or for any
period of time during the eight years preceding the date of his
or her application.
2. Any other public office at the time of or for any period of time
during the four years preceding the date of his or her
application.
b. Held a political appointment.
c. Served as an elected or appointed officer of a political party, body, or
committee at any level of government in the United States.
d. Served as an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a political party
or body or of the campaign or campaign committee of a candidate for
public office in the United States.
e. Been convicted of any of the following crimes against a governmental
body of the United States or a crime with a direct connection to the
crimes:
1. Espionage.
2. Terrorism.
3. Treason.
4. Sabotage.
Page 4 Senate Bill 638-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
5. Sedition.
6. Insurrection.
(6) Is not a legislative staffer, lobbyist, or legislative liaison.
(7) Has not been employed by Congress within 10 years of applying for
membership on the Commission.
(c) Membership Application; Evaluations. – Any citizen of North Carolina may apply to
the State Auditor to be a member of the Commission, according to the following process:
(1) The State Auditor shall ensure that applications are available for at least six
months beginning in each year ending in nine. The State Auditor shall work
with the State Ethics Commission to publicize the application process,
including advertising the application period, commission qualifications, and
selection process in at least the following ways:
a. In the following:
1. For at least one month, the 10 media outlets in the State with
the highest circulation.
2. The main website for all State agencies.
3. Appropriate local news broadcasts.
4. Media outlets that serve minority communities.
b. By distributing paper applications to at least the following:
1. At least one percent (1%) of all registered voters in North
Carolina. Recipients of paper applications shall be selected
randomly but in no event shall more than thirty-three percent
(33%) of the recipients be affiliated or not affiliated with a
particular party.
2. Any registered voter in North Carolina who submits a request
for an application.
c. To tribal nations located in North Carolina. The State Auditor shall
encourage indigenous persons to apply to be a member of the
Commission and may coordinate for that purpose with the Division of
Indian Affairs of the North Carolina Department of Administration,
the North Carolina State Commission of Indian Affairs, and any
State-recognized Indian tribe.
(2) As part of a person's application, that person shall (i) disclose all relevant
relationships and positions and (ii) submit to the State Auditor an attestation
that the person is eligible to serve as a member of the Commission pursuant
to subsection (b) of this section.
(3) The State Auditor shall evaluate applications to ensure they meet the
requirements of this section and any other requirements of State law. The State
Auditor shall submit all eligible applications to the State Ethics Commission.
The State Ethics Commission shall review the eligible applications and submit
a diverse group of up to 60 applications to the General Assembly, as follows:
a. Applications submitted to the General Assembly shall reflect the
State's diverse races, ethnicities, nationalities, sexual orientations,
socioeconomic statuses, and geography.
b. The State Ethics Commission shall submit no more than 20
applications from persons registered in each of the following ways, as
reflected by the latest registration statistics published by the State
Board of Elections:
1. As affiliated with the political party with the highest number
of registered affiliates.
Senate Bill 638-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2. As affiliated with the political party with the second-highest
number of registered affiliates.
3. As not affiliated with either of the two political parties having
the highest and second-highest number of registered affiliates.
c. If there are fewer than 20 applications from persons registered in
accordance with any sub-sub-subdivision of sub-subdivision (3)b. of
this subsection, the State Ethics Commission may submit additional
eligible applications to the General Assembly, as necessary, to reach a
total of 60 applications.
(4) Of the pool of candidates submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to
subdivision (3) of this subsection, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,
the minority leader in the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
and the minority leader in the House of Representatives may each strike up to
six candidates.
(d) Appointment. – The Commission shall be composed of 15 members appointed from
the pool of candidates that remains after the leaders of the General Assembly have made their
strikes pursuant to subdivision (4) of subsection (c) of this section, as follows:
(1) Two members affiliated in each of the three ways identified in sub-subdivision
b. of subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of this section, appointed by the State
Ethics Commission, for a total of six members.
(2) Three members affiliated in each of the three ways identified in
sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of this section, by the
six members appointed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, for a
total of nine members.
(3) All appointing authorities shall consider the importance of diversity, as
defined in sub-subdivision (c)(3)a. of this section, when making their
appointments.
(e) Term of Office. – The term of office for members of the Commission shall begin on
July 1 of each year ending in zero. The members shall continue in office for 10 years until their
successors are appointed and qualified.
(f) Chair. – The position of chair of the Commission shall rotate every three months,
following a schedule randomly generated at the beginning of the redistricting cycle. No two
members who share the same party affiliation, or lack thereof, shall serve as chair in the same
six-month period. No member shall serve as chair more than once in a 12-month period.
(g) Removal from Office. – A member of the Commission may be removed from office,
as follows:
(1) By the authority that appointed the member for any of the following:
a. Failure to comply with G.S. 120-4.65.
b. Ineligibility pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(2) By a vote of at least 11 members of the Commission, including at least one
commissioner appointed from the same sub-sub-subdivision of
sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of this section, in open
session at any duly held meeting, for any cause that renders the member
incapable or unfit to discharge the duties of the office, including neglect of
duty or gross misconduct. All Commission member votes on removal of a
member pursuant to this subdivision shall be recorded in the record.
(h) Vacancies. – Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Commission shall be
filled in the manner prescribed in this section by the authority that made the initial appointment.
Vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(i) Stipend. – Members of the Commission shall receive a stipend of one thousand two
hundred dollars ($1,200) for each month that the Commission meets. Beginning July 1, 2040,
Page 6 Senate Bill 638-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and every 10 years thereafter, the Legislative Services Officer shall adjust the monthly stipend
amount, as necessary, to ensure that the value of the stipend remains equivalent to the value
provided in the previous decade. The Legislative Services Officer shall base this adjustment on
the change in the Employment Cost Index (ECI) reported by the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics or an equivalent measure of inflation.
(j) Other Expenses. – Members of the Commission may receive travel and subsistence,
as follows:
(1) Members who are officials or employees of a State agency or unit of local
government, in accordance with G.S. 138-6.
(2) All other members at the rate established in G.S. 138-5.
"§ 120-4.60. Staff.
(a) The Commission shall be administratively housed in the Legislative Services Office
of the General Assembly.
(b) The Commission may exercise its prescribed powers independently of the General
Assembly and the Legislative Services Officer. In order to pay expenses incidental to
implementing its purposes, the Commission may enter into contracts, own property, and accept
funds, grants, and gifts from academic and nonprofit entities that have never contributed to
political parties, persons holding public office, or candidates for public office.
(c) The Legislative Services Officer shall provide general administrative support to the
Commission, including purchasing, payroll, and similar administrative services.
(d) The Commission shall retain independent staff under contract, including an executive
secretary and any additional necessary supporting staff. As a whole, the political affiliations of
staff members, or lack thereof, shall be divided approximately into thirds among the two political
parties with the highest number of affiliates and among persons unaffiliated with a political party.
A person is ineligible to serve as a staff member to the Commission if that person would be
ineligible to serve as a member of the Commission pursuant to G.S. 120-4.55(b). Staff shall be
selected as follows:
(1) If there are at least three members appointed to the Commission from each
sub-sub-subdivision of G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b., staff shall be selected by a vote
of at least nine members composed of at least three members appointed to the
Commission from each sub-sub-subdivision of G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b.
(2) If there are not at least three members appointed to the Commission from each
sub-sub-subdivision of G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b., staff shall be selected by a vote
of all of the following:
a. At least three members from each sub-sub-subdivision of
G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b. with more than three members appointed to the
Commission.
b. A unanimous vote from each sub-sub-subdivision of
G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b. with three or fewer members appointed to the
Commission.
"§ 120-4.65. Open meetings and public records.
The Commission shall be subject to the Public Records Act, Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes, and the Open Meetings Law, Article 33C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, except
to the extent those enactments conflict with the below requirements:
(1) Members of the Commission and staff shall not discuss the business of the
Commission outside public meetings.
(2) If a member of the Commission violates subdivision (1) of this section, he or
she shall place in the public records of the Commission (i) any violating
written communication and (ii) a written description of any violating oral
communication. The written description of an oral communication must
include the name of the parties to the communication, the date and
Senate Bill 638-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
approximate time of the communication, and a description of the nature and
substance of the communication.
(3) The Commission shall provide at least 14 days' notice prior to any meeting in
which votes will be taken.
"§ 120-4.70. Redistricting criteria.
All plans shall meet the following goals, in order of priority:
(1) Each identified representative shall represent, as nearly as may be, an equal
number of inhabitants.
(2) Compliance with the North Carolina Constitution, State law, the Constitution
of the United States, including the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth
Amendment, and federal law, to ensure that everyone, including members of
minority groups, have an equal opportunity to elect representatives of their
choice. A plan shall not diminish or dilute the ability of a member of a
minority from electing a candidate of his or her choice, whether alone or in
coalition with others.
(3) In accordance with subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, the population for
a legislative district shall be within five percent (5%) of the ideal population
for that district. Congressional districts shall each have a population that is as
nearly equal as practicable to the ideal population but in all cases within
one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the ideal population for that district.
(4) All districts shall be contiguous. Areas that meet only at the points of
adjoining corners are not contiguous.
(5) Minimizing the number of split communities of interest with the following
communities of interest prioritized above all others and in the following order:
a. Municipalities and census designated places.
b. Precincts.
c. Counties.
(6) The Commission shall not consider electoral results or political considerations
in the preparation of a preliminary, proposed, or alternative plan. In order to
ensure that each citizen of the State has substantially equal voting power on
the basis of party affiliation, the Commission shall evaluate every proposed
and alternative plan after the plan is created to avoid inadvertently diminishing
or diluting a voter's opportunity to aggregate with likeminded voters to elect
a governing majority based on party affiliation. Before adopting a final plan,
the Commission shall revise any plan that it deems to have violated this
subdivision to the minimum extent necessary to remedy that violation.
(7) Districts shall not favor or disfavor an incumbent, and the Commission shall
not consider member residency in the preparation of a plan.
(8) To the extent practicable, all districts shall be compact. Districts should not
bypass nearby communities for more distant communities.
"§ 120-4.75. Adoption of redistricting plans by the Commission.
(a) Duties. – The Commission shall adopt preliminary, proposed, alternative, and final
plans, as follows:
(1) If there are at least three members appointed to the Commission from each
sub-sub-subdivision of G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b., plans shall be adopted by a vote
of at least nine members composed of at least three members appointed to the
Commission from each sub-sub-subdivision of G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b.
(2) If there are not at least three members appointed to the Commission from each
sub-sub-subdivision of G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b., plans shall be adopted by a vote
of all of the following:
Page 8 Senate Bill 638-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. At least three members from each sub-sub-subdivision of
G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b. with more than three members appointed to the
Commission.
b. A unanimous vote of the members from each sub-sub-subdivision of
G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b. with three or fewer members appointed to the
Commission.
(b) Special Master. – At the beginning of the redistricting cycle, the State Ethics
Commission shall submit to the Commission a list of names of persons with an expertise in
redistricting who are qualified to serve as a special master. A person is ineligible to serve as a
special master if that person would be ineligible to serve as a member of the Commission
pursuant to G.S. 120-4.55(b). In the event a plan cannot be adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section, the Commission shall appoint a special master from the list of names provided by
the State Ethics Commission, and the special master shall draw a plan and submit the plan, along
with the rationale for the plan, to the Commission, which shall adopt that plan. The special master
shall be appointed as follows:
(1) If there are at least three members appointed to the Commission from each
sub-sub-subdivision of G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b., the special master shall be
appointed by a vote of at least nine members composed of at least three
members appointed to the Commission from each sub-sub-subdivision of
G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b.
(2) If there are not at least three members appointed to the Commission from each
sub-sub-subdivision of G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b., the special master shall be
appointed by a vote of all of the following:
a. At least three members from each sub-sub-subdivision of
G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b. with more than three members appointed to the
Commission.
b. A unanimous vote of the members from each sub-sub-subdivision of
G.S. 120-4.55(c)(3)b. with three or fewer members appointed to the
Commission.
(c) Time Line. – The Commission shall adopt all plans no later than October 1 of the year
following each federal census. Prior to the adoption of a plan, the Commission shall adhere to
the following maximum time line:
(1) Within 30 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the Commission
shall hold at least 10 initial public hearings pursuant to G.S. 120-4.80.
(2) Within 50 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the Commission
shall release to the public preliminary plans for revising the congressional and
legislative districts.
(3) Within 70 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the Commission
shall hold at least an additional 10 public hearings pursuant to G.S. 120-4.80.
(4) Within 90 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the Commission
shall release to the public all of the following:
a. Proposed plans for revising the congressional and legislative districts.
b. Alternative plans for revising the congressional and legislative
districts.
c. A summary of public input provided pursuant to G.S. 120-4.80.
(5) Within 110 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the Commission
shall vote to adopt final plans from its proposed or alternative plans for
revising the congressional and legislative districts.
(6) If the Commission fails to adopt any plan pursuant to subdivision (5) of this
subsection, the Commission shall adhere to the following extended maximum
time line:
Senate Bill 638-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Within 130 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the
Commission shall select from the list of names provided by the State
Ethics Commission pursuant to subsection (b) of this section a special
master to complete the plan or plans. The Commission shall provide
the special master with its proposed and alternative plans and all
supporting data.
b. Within 150 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the special
master shall prepare and release a plan and a rationale for any changes
from the plans released by the Commission. The special master shall
present the plan to the Commission.
c. Within 170 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the
Commission shall hold at least 10 public hearings pursuant to
G.S. 120-4.80 on the plan or plans presented by the special master.
d. Within 180 days of receipt of data from the Census Bureau, the
Commission shall adopt as a final plan the plan presented by the
special master.
(7) Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) through (6) of this subsection, the
Commission may extend the maximum number of days between any event
required in this subsection by as many as seven days, up to a total of 40 days
over the course of a year, for good cause.
"§ 120-4.80. Public input.
(a) Public Hearings. – For each redistricting cycle, the Commission shall engage in a
minimum of 25 public hearings. At least one public hearing shall occur in each of the
metropolitan and micropolitan statistical areas of the State. Of the total public hearings, at least
10 hearings shall occur before a preliminary plan is released to the public, and at least 10 hearings
shall occur after a preliminary plan is released to the public but before a proposed or alternative
plan is released to the public.
(b) Public Input. – To the extent possible, the Commission shall facilitate the ability of
members of the public to provide substantive comments on any plan released to the public. To
achieve that goal, the Commission shall provide members of the public with all of the following:
(1) Sufficient time to review any plan released to the public.
(2) The opportunity to communicate comments, questions, and recommendations
on any plan released to the public, at a minimum, in person, online, and
through the mail. The Commission shall reserve time at the end of every
meeting for in-person and virtual public comment.
(3) Access to the same demographic data that is used by the Commission in a
machine-readable form.
(4) Access to mapping software and census data in a minimum of 30 public library
facilities in the State within 20 days of receipt of that data from the United
States Bureau of the Census.
(5) A public, written response to every substantive comment or recommendation
regarding a specific component of a plan released to the public. The response
shall address the viability of any recommendation and indicate whether it was
or will be incorporated in any other plan. A single response may be provided
for one or more comments or recommendations on the same topic.
(6) At the conclusion of the redistricting process, the Commission shall publish a
written evaluation of each final plan, including at least the following
information:
a. The impact of the plans on the ability of minority groups, including
racial minorities, to elect candidates of their choice.
Page 10 Senate Bill 638-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. The degree to which the plans preserve or divide communities of
interest.
c. The rationale for changes in the plans from the prior districts.
d. The impact of the plans on the metropolitan and micropolitan
statistical areas of the State.
e. A summary of the public input received by the Commission on the
plans.
f. An explanation of how the plans comply with the redistricting criteria
provided in G.S. 120-4.70.
(7) A website with all of the following information:
a. Background information on the redistricting process available in at
least English and Spanish on the purpose of redistricting and its impact
on all communities. The Commission shall provide information in
other languages if at least 50,000 people petition the Commission to
have a particular language included.
b. Livestreams and recordings of all public meetings in audio, video, or
both formats and minutes from those meetings.
c. Meeting announcements.
d. A searchable database of feedback, including public comments, and
plans discussed by the Commission. This information shall be made
available as soon as practicable after it is generated.
e. Plans discussed by the Commission and the data used to create those
plans.
"§ 120-4.85. Local redistricting.
The General Assembly may by law assign to the Commission the duty to prepare district
plans for any county, city, town, special district, and other governmental subdivision, if the
governing board of the unit or a court of appropriate jurisdiction so requests."
SECTION 1.(h) Notwithstanding G.S. 120-4.55(e), as enacted by this act, for any
redistricting that may occur prior to the return of the 2030 federal census, the term of office for
members of the North Carolina Citizens Redistricting Commission shall begin on January 1,
2027, and conclude on June 30, 2030.

PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 120-2.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-2.3. Contents of judgments invalidating apportionment or redistricting acts.
Every order or judgment declaring unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, in whole or in part
and for any reason, any act of the General Assembly plan that apportions or redistricts State
legislative or congressional districts shall find with specificity all facts supporting that
declaration, shall state separately and with specificity the court's conclusions of law on that
declaration, and shall, with specific reference to those findings of fact and conclusions of law,
identify every defect found by the court, both as to the plan as a whole and as to individual
districts."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 120-2.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-2.4. Opportunity for General Assembly to remedy defects.
(a) If the General Assembly enacts a plan apportioning or redistricting State legislative
or congressional districts, districts becomes effective, in no event may a court impose its own
substitute plan unless the court first gives the General Assembly North Carolina Citizens
Redistricting Commission a period of time to remedy any defects identified by the court in its
findings of fact and conclusions of law. That period of time shall not be less than two weeks,
provided, however, that if the General Assembly is scheduled to convene legislative session
Senate Bill 638-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
within 45 days of the date of the court order that period of time shall not be less than two weeks
from the convening of that legislative session.weeks.
(a1) In the event the General Assembly North Carolina Citizens Redistricting Commission
does not act to remedy any identified defects to its plan within that period of time, the court may
impose an interim districting plan for use in the next general election only, but that interim
districting plan may differ from the previous districting plan enacted by the General Assembly
only to the extent necessary to remedy any defects identified by the court.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or authority of the State Board of
Elections under Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, the State Board of Elections shall have no
authority to alter, amend, correct, impose, or substitute any plan apportioning or redistricting
State legislative or congressional districts other than a plan imposed by a court under this section
or a plan enacted by the General Assembly.adopted by the North Carolina Citizens Redistricting
Commission."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3.(a) If the constitutional amendments proposed by subsections (a), (b),
(c), and (d) of Section 1 of this act are approved by the qualified voters as provided in subsections
(e) and (f) of Section 1 of this act, the following shall become effective January 1, 2027:
(1) Subsections (g) and (h) of Section 1 of this act.
(2) Part II of this act.
SECTION 3.(b) Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 12 Senate Bill 638-First Edition